Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 49. EDUCATION--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 6. TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY

Art. 2632f. CONVEYANCE OF EASEMENT TO CITY OF LUBBOCK FOR EMERGENCY TELEPHONES. In consideration of the benefits derived from and accruing to the State of Texas and Texas Technological College from the installation, construction, reconstruction, operation, maintenance and repair of a fire alarm signal system to be installed, constructed, reconstructed, operated and maintained to promote the welfare and safety of the inhabitants of the State of Texas, using the facilities of Texas Technological College and to further preserve said facilities, the Chairman of the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College is hereby authorized and directed to execute and deliver on behalf of the State of Texas and Texas Technological College, to the City of Lubbock, a municipal corporation of Lubbock County, Texas, a proper instrument conveying to said City of Lubbock an easement with right of ingress and egress to install, construct, reconstruct, operate and maintain five emergency telephones, with red lights, at strategic points and locations on the campus as may be determined by the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College. The Chairman of the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College is hereby authorized and directed, for and on behalf of said Board of Directors, to execute and deliver such conveyance to carry out the purpose of this Act to the City of Lubbock, Lubbock County, Texas.

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 443, ch. 216.

Art. 2632f-1. CONVEYANCE OF PERMANENT WATER LINE EASEMENT. In consideration of the benefits which will accrue to the State of Texas and Texas Technological College from the construction, reconstruction, operation and maintenance by the City of Lubbock, a Home Rule Municipal Corporation, of a permanent water line together with all appurtenances thereto, in, under and across certain lands in Lubbock County, Texas, such land being owned by the State of Texas and constituting a portion of Texas Technological College, the Chairman of the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College is hereby authorized to execute and deliver on behalf of the State of Texas and Texas Technological College to the City of Lubbock a proper instrument conveying to said City of Lubbock a permanent water line easement with the right of ingress and egress to construct, reconstruct, operate and maintain a permanent water line, to be located as more particularly determined by the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College upon approval by said Board of Directors of the plans and specifications for the construction of said water line facility, and the said Chairman of the Board of Directors of Texas Technological College is hereby authorized for and on behalf of said Board of Directors to execute and deliver such conveyance to carry out the purposes of this Act to the City of Lubbock, Lubbock County, Texas.

Acts 1967, 60th Leg., p. 1093, ch. 482, Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 1967.